es: Método de limpieza por pulverización de cadena: Despegar cuando esté seco; Requiere solvente/limpiador; Agua y jabón; Enjuague con agua; Limpiar con un paño húmedo; Otro
zh-TW: 噴彩罐清理方式: 變乾後撕下; 需使用溶劑/清潔劑; 肥皂和水; 清水沖洗; 用濕布擦拭; 其他
sv: Rengöringsmetod för spraysträng: Dra av när den är torr; Kräver lösningsmedel/rengöringsmedel; Tvål och vatten; Sköljning med vatten; Torka av med fuktig trasa; Övrigt
it: Metodo di pulizia della schiuma filante spray: Rimuovere una volta asciutto; Richiede solvente/detergente; Acqua e sapone; Risciacquo con acqua; Pulire con panno umido; Altro
ro-RO: Metodă de curățare a sprayului cu spumă: Se dezlipește după uscare; Necesită solvent/soluție de curățat; Apă și săpun; Clătire cu apă; Ștergere cu o lavetă umedă; Altele
hr-HR: Metoda čišćenja raspršivačem: Oguliti kad se osuši; Potrebno otapalo/sredstvo za čišćenje; Sapun i voda; Ispiranje vodom; Brisanje vlažnom krpom; Ostalo
zh-CN: 喷丝清理方法: 干燥后撕下; 需要溶剂/清洁剂; 肥皂和水; 清水冲洗; 用湿布擦拭; 其他
de: Reinigungsmethode für Sprühschlangen: Im trockenen Zustand abziehen; Erfordert Lösungsmittel/Reiniger; Wasser und Seife; Mit Wasser abspülen; Mit einem feuchten Tuch abwischen; Sonstige
ru: Метод очистки аэрозольной нити: Снять пленкой после высыхания; Требуется растворитель/очиститель; Вода с мылом; Смывается водой; Стереть влажной тканью; Другой
nl: Serpentinespray reinigingsmethode: Lostrekken als het droog is; Vereist oplosmiddel/schoonmaakmiddel; Water en zeep; Afspoelen met water; Afnemen met vochtige doek; Overige
hu: Szerpentin spray tisztítási módszer: Száradás után lehúzható; Oldószert/tisztítószert igényel; Szappanos víz; Vízzel öblíthető; Nedves ruhával törölhető; Egyéb
tr: Sprey ip temizleme yöntemi: Kuruduğunda soyulur; Çözücü/temizleyici gerektirir; Sabun ve su; Suyla durulama; Nemli bezle silme; Diğer
pt-BR: Serpentina em spray método de limpeza: Remover ao secar; Requer solvente/produto de limpeza; Água e sabão; Enxágue com água; Limpar com pano úmido; Outro
vi: Phương pháp làm sạch bằng cách phun sương: Bóc ra khi khô; Cần dung môi/chất tẩy rửa; Xà phòng và nước; Xả lại bằng nước; Lau bằng khăn ẩm; Khác
pl: Metoda usuwanie serpentyny w sprayu: Zdejmij po wyschnięciu; Wymaga rozpuszczalnika/środka czyszczącego; Woda z mydłem; Spłukiwane wodą; Przecierane wilgotną ściereczką; Inne
nb: Rengjøringsmetode med spraystrenger: Trekk av når tørr; Krever løsemiddel/rengjøringsmiddel; Såpe og vann; Skylling med vann; Tørk med fuktig klut; Annet
bg-BG: Метод за почистване на парти спрей нишки: Отлепване след изсъхване; Изисква разтворител/почистващ препарат; Сапун и вода; Изплакване с вода; Избърсване с влажна кърпа; Друго
pt-PT: Método de limpeza do fio de spray: Descolar quando seco; Requer solvente/produto de limpeza; Água e sabão; Enxaguar com água; Limpar com pano húmido; Outro
th: วิธีการทำความสะอาดคราบสเปรย์: ลอกออกเมื่อแห้ง; ต้องใช้ตัวทำละลาย/น้ำยาทำความสะอาด; สบู่และน้ำ; ล้างน้ำ; เช็ดด้วยผ้าหมาด; อื่นๆ
fr: Méthode de nettoyage de la bombe à serpentins: Peler une fois sec; Nécessite un solvant/nettoyant; Eau et savon; Rinçage à l’eau; Essuyer avec un chiffon humide; Autre
en: Spray string cleanup method: Peel off when dry; Requires solvent/cleaner; Soap & water; Water rinse; Wipe with damp cloth; Other
cs: Metoda čištění provázku ve spreji: Sloupnutí po zaschnutí; Vyžaduje rozpouštědlo/čistič; Voda s mýdlem; Opláchnutí vodou; Otření vlhkým hadříkem; Jiné
sl-SI: Način čiščenja nitk v razpršilu: Odstranitev z luščenjem, ko se posuši; Zahteva topilo/čistilo; Milo in voda; Spiranje z vodo; Brisanje z vlažno krpo; Drugo
fi: Serpentiinisprayn puhdistusmenetelmä: Irrotetaan kuivana vetämällä; Vaatii liuotinta/puhdistusainetta; Saippua ja vesi; Vesihuuhtelu; Pyyhkiminen kostealla liinalla; Muu
ja: スプレーストリングの掃除方法: 乾いたら剥がす; 溶剤 / クリーナーが必要; 石けんと水; 水洗い; 濡れた布で拭き取る; その他
el: Μέθοδος καθαρισμού σπρέι σερπαντίνας: Αφαίρεση με ξεφλούδισμα όταν στεγνώσει; Απαιτεί διαλύτη/καθαριστικό; Σαπούνι και νερό; Ξέβγαλμα με νερό; Σκούπισμα με υγρό πανί; Άλλο
lt-LT: Purškiamų siūlų valymo metodas: Nulupti išdžiūvus; Reikia tirpiklio / valiklio; Muilas ir vanduo; Nuplauti vandeniu; Nuvalyti drėgna šluoste; Kita
ko: 스프레이 스트링 청소 방법: 마른 후 떼어내기; 용제/세척제 필요; 비누 및 물; 물 세척; 젖은 천으로 닦기; 기타
sk-SK: Spôsob čistenia pomocou spreja: Zlúpnuť po zaschnutí; Vyžaduje rozpúšťadlo/čistič; Mydlo a voda; Opláchnutie vodou; Utretie vlhkou handričkou; Iné
da: Metode til rengøring af sprayserpentiner: Træk af, når det er tørt; Kræver opløsningsmiddel/rengøringsmiddel; Vand og sæbe; Skyl med vand; Tør af med fugtig klud; Andet